Connecticut, session 2026, SB00509.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (11) of section 54-250 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(11) "Sexually violent offense" means (A) a violation of section 53a-
70b of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2019,
or section 53a-70, except subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of said section,
53a-70a, 53a-71, except subdivision (1), (4), (8) or (10) or subparagraph
(B) of subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of said section or subparagraph
(A) of subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of said section if the court makes
a finding that, at the time of the offense, the victim was under eighteen
years of age, 53a-72a, except subdivision [(2)] (3) of subsection (a) of said
section, or 53a-72b, or of section 53a-92 or 53a-92a, provided the court
makes a finding that the offense was committed with intent to sexually
violate or abuse the victim, (B) a violation of any of the offenses specified
in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision for which a person is criminally
liable under section 53a-8, 53a-48 or 53a-49, or (C) a violation of any
predecessor statute to any of the offenses specified in subparagraph (A)
or (B) of this subdivision the essential elements of which are

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
substantially the same as said offense.
Sec. 2. Subsection (e) of section 54-251 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(e) (1) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section shall be guilty of a class D felony, except that, if such person
violates the provisions of this section by failing to notify the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection without
undue delay of a change of name, address or status or another
reportable event, such person shall only be subject to such penalty if
such failure continues for five business days.
(2) In any prosecution of a person for a violation of subsection (a) of
this section, it shall be an affirmative defense that (A) circumstances
beyond the control of the person prevented the person from complying
with the provisions of said subsection (a), (B) the person did not
contribute to the creation of such circumstances, and (C) such person
was in compliance with the provisions of said subsection (a) not later
than twenty business days after such circumstances ceased to exist.
Sec. 3. Subsection (d) of section 54-252 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) (1) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class D felony, except that, if such person violates the
provisions of this section by failing to notify the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection without undue delay of a
change of name, address or status or another reportable event, such
person shall only be subject to such penalty if such failure continues for
five business days.
(2) In any prosecution of a person for a violation of this section, it
Public Act No. 26-96 2 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
shall be an affirmative defense that (A) circumstances beyond the
control of the person prevented the person from complying with the
provisions of this section, (B) the person did not contribute to the
creation of such circumstances, and (C) such person was in compliance
with the provisions of this section not later than twenty business days
after such circumstances ceased to exist.
Sec. 4. Subsection (e) of section 54-253 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(e) (1) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class D felony, except that, if such person violates the
provisions of this section by failing to register with the Commissioner
of Emergency Services and Public Protection without undue delay or
notify the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
without undue delay of a change of name, address or status or another
reportable event, such person shall only be subject to such penalty if
such failure continues for five business days.
(2) In any prosecution of a person for a violation of this section, it
shall be an affirmative defense that (A) circumstances beyond the
control of the person prevented the person from complying with the
provisions of this section, (B) the person did not contribute to the
creation of such circumstances, and (C) such person was in compliance
with the provisions of this section not later than twenty business days
after such circumstances ceased to exist.
Sec. 5. Subsection (b) of section 54-254 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) (1) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class D felony, except that, if such person violates the
Public Act No. 26-96 3 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
provisions of this section by failing to notify the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection without undue delay of a
change of name, address or status or another reportable event, such
person shall only be subject to such penalty if such failure continues for
five business days.
(2) In any prosecution of a person for a violation of this section, it
shall be an affirmative defense that (A) circumstances beyond the
control of the person prevented the person from complying with the
provisions of this section, (B) the person did not contribute to the
creation of such circumstances, and (C) such person was in compliance
with the provisions of this section not later than twenty business days
after such circumstances ceased to exist.
Sec. 6. Section 54-257 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
shall, not later than January 1, 1999, establish and maintain a registry of
all persons required to register under sections 54-251, as amended by
this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as amended by this act,
and 54-254, as amended by this act. The department shall, in cooperation
with the Office of the Chief Court Administrator, the Department of
Correction and the Psychiatric Security Review Board, develop
appropriate forms for use by agencies and individuals to report
registration information, including changes of residence address. Upon
receipt of registration information, the department shall enter the
information into the registry and notify the local police department or
state police troop having jurisdiction where the registrant resides or
plans to reside. If a registrant notifies the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection that such registrant is employed at,
carries on a vocation at or is a student at a trade or professional
institution or institution of higher learning in this state, the department
shall notify the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over such
Public Act No. 26-96 4 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
institution. If a registrant reports a residence in another state, the
department shall notify the state police agency of that state or such other
agency in that state that maintains registry information, if known. The
department shall also transmit all registration information, conviction
data, photographic images and fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation in such form as said bureau shall require for inclusion in a
national registry.
(b) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
may suspend the registration of any person registered under section 54-
251, as amended by this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as
amended by this act, or 54-254, as amended by this act, while such
person is incarcerated, under civil commitment or residing outside this
state. During the period that such registration is under suspension, the
department is not required to verify the residence address of the
registrant pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) of this section and may
withdraw the registration information from public access. Upon the
release of the registrant from incarceration or civil commitment or
resumption of residency in this state by the registrant, the department
shall reinstate the registration, redistribute the registration information
in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and resume verifying
the residence address of the registrant in accordance with subsection (c)
or (d) of this section. Suspension of registration shall not affect the date
of expiration of the registration obligation of the registrant under section
54-251, as amended by this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, or 54-253,
as amended by this act.
[(c) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall verify
the residence address of each registrant by mailing]
(c) Any person registered under section 54-251, as amended by this
act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as amended by this act, or
54-254, as amended by this act, shall provide proof of residency by mail,
Public Act No. 26-96 5 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
facsimile or electronic mail or in person to the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection not more than ninety days, but not fewer
than seventy-five days after such person's initial registration date. The
department shall accept any of the following documents as proof of
residency, provided such document contains the registrant's residence
address and is dated not earlier than thirty days prior to submission of
such document to the department: (1) A utility bill, including, but not
limited to, a bill for electricity, gas, water or Internet service; (2) a
financial statement, including, but not limited to, a bank statement or
credit card statement; (3) a homeowner's, renter's or motor vehicle
insurance bill or statement; (4) official correspondence from a state or
federal government agency; or (5) any other document that the
department deems sufficient to prove residency.
(d) If the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
has not received proof of residency pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, the department shall mail a nonforwardable address
verification form to the registrant at the registrant's last reported
residence address. Such form shall require the registrant to sign a
statement that the registrant continues to reside at the registrant's last
reported residence address and return the form by mail, facsimile or
electronic mail or in person by a date which is ten days after the date
[such form] of the postmark on the form that was mailed to the
registrant. The form shall contain a (1) statement that failure to return
the form or providing false information is a violation of section 54-251,
as amended by this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as
amended by this act, or 54-254, as amended by this act, as the case may
be, and (2) statement printed in bold text (A) explaining that the form
may be returned to the department by mail, facsimile or electronic mail
or in person, and (B) providing the mailing address, facsimile number,
electronic mail address and the physical address for in-person return of
such form. In the case of a registrant who resides at a residence address
for which there is no residential mail delivery, the local police
Public Act No. 26-96 6 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
department or the state police troop having jurisdiction where the
registrant resides shall verify in person such registrant's residence
address. Each person required to register under section 54-251, as
amended by this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as amended
by this act, or 54-254, as amended by this act, shall have such person's
residence address verified in such manner every ninety days after such
person's initial registration date, unless such person provides the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection proof of
residency in the same manner provided for in subsection (c) of this
section. In the event that a registrant fails to return the residence address
verification form or provide proof of residency to the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection in the same manner provided
for in subsection (c) of this section, the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall notify the local police department
or the state police troop having jurisdiction over the registrant's last
reported residence address, and that agency shall apply for a warrant to
be issued for the registrant's arrest under section 54-251, as amended by
this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as amended by this act,
or 54-254, as amended by this act, as the case may be. The Department
of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall not verify the address
of registrants whose last reported residence address was outside this
state.
[(d)] (e) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
shall include in the registry the most recent photographic image of each
registrant taken by the department, the Department of Correction, a law
enforcement agency or the Court Support Services Division of the
Judicial Department and shall retake the photographic image of each
registrant at least once every five years.
[(e)] (f) Whenever the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection receives notice from a superior court pursuant to
section 52-11 or a probate court pursuant to section 45a-99 that such
Public Act No. 26-96 7 of 8

Substitute Senate Bill No. 509
court has ordered the change of name of a person, and the department
determines that such person is listed in the registry, the department
shall revise such person's registration information accordingly.
[(f)] (g) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection shall develop a protocol for the notification of other state
agencies, the Judicial Department and local police departments
whenever a person listed in the registry changes such person's name
and notifies the commissioner of the new name pursuant to section 54-
251, as amended by this act, 54-252, as amended by this act, 54-253, as
amended by this act, or 54-254, as amended by this act, or whenever the
commissioner determines pursuant to subsection [(e)] (f) of this section
that a person listed in the registry has changed such person's name.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-96 8 of 8